Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 2. Superintendent Of Public Instruction And Department Of Education
§ 21-2-203.
School district data collection and funding model administration; duties and responsibilities specified; data advisory committee; school district compliance.

The department shall collect data for the state’s school finance system and in accordance with rule and regulation of the state superintendent, administer the Wyoming education resource block grant model adopted by the Wyoming legislature pursuant to W.S.

21-13-309

. As used in this section, “school finance system” means all statutes related to the terms and conditions under which funds from Wyoming sources are made available under Wyoming law to the public schools for school operations. The school finance system established following a 1995 Wyoming supreme court decision, and subsequently modified and recalibrated as required under W.S.

21-13-309

(t), is extremely complex and requires timely and accurate data to be administered fairly and accurately. It is essential that a single entity be established to ensure that fair and accurate administration is accomplished.

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 2.

The duties of the department are, in accordance with rules promulgated by the state superintendent, to:

Administer the school finance, data management and reporting system for the funding of the public schools, including enforcement of rules for compliance with submission of data to the department by school districts;

Collect data from school districts necessary for the department to administer the school finance system and the statewide education accountability system established under W.S.

21-2-204

. In accomplishing this, the department shall:

Coordinate its work with all other functions of the department so as to consolidate data reporting requirements for school districts and eliminate duplication in reporting to the greatest extent possible, including reporting of assessment results required for determinations under W.S.

21-2-204

;

Consult with the advisory committee created under subsection (d) of this section with respect to the type and format of data to be reported and the administration of the system generally;

Use existing data to establish longitudinal data systems as necessary for the statewide education accountability system.

Specify formats, uniform accounting standards, procedures and processes under which districts are required to account for and report data to the department. Electronic reporting shall be required wherever possible;

Recommend to the state superintendent proposed rules to improve the accuracy and reliability of data and the general efficiency of the operation of the school finance system, including requiring training for district personnel with respect to accounting and reporting related to the administration of the school finance system;

Provide for the training of school district personnel with respect to rules, policies and procedures with which districts are required to comply in order for the department to administer the school finance system. The department may charge reasonable fees necessary to defray the costs of training;

Cooperate with and consult with other state agencies which have responsibilities related to the operation of the school finance system. This cooperation may include providing recommendations for modification to rules, practices and procedures of other agencies;

Ensure that comprehensive school finance system information is available in useful formats to state policymakers in both the executive and legislative branches of government, as well as to the school districts and the general public;

Assist the state superintendent in implementing W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(D) and assist districts with computations necessary for reporting student career and technical education participation and career and technical education instruction information;

Pursuant to W.S. 21-2-202(e), make the education resource block grant model available for public inspection.

The state superintendent of public instruction shall establish an advisory committee consisting of not less than seven (7) members. This advisory committee shall have representatives from among Wyoming school districts, other state agencies involved in the administration of the school finance system, shall include the director of the department of audit or his designee, and shall include at least one (1) representative from the independent auditor community within the state. The committee shall meet at least twice annually and at the call of the state superintendent or his designee. The duties of the advisory committee are to:

Recommend modifications to department rules, policies, practices and procedures to improve the accuracy of data and to improve the efficiency of the data collection process and the administration of the school finance system generally;

Since accurate, timely data is essential for fair administration of the school finance system, recommend rules or other means to ensure districts comply with data reporting and other requirements necessary for administration of the school finance system, including proposing modifications to subsection (e) of this section;

Serve as ongoing forum for communications between the department and school districts with respect to the administration of the school finance system.

The following shall apply:

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch 24, § 2.

If a district fails to provide data or reports in compliance with law or rules regarding timeliness, format, completeness or accuracy, without good cause, the state superintendent shall:

Advise the district’s board of trustees of the noncompliance and require the district’s board to submit a plan to correct the noncompliance and prevent future instances of noncompliance.

and (C) Repealed by Laws 2005, ch 99, § 2.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 2, § 801; 1999, ch. 110, § 501; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 76, § 2; 2003, ch. 164, § 2; 2005, ch. 99, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 37, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 184, § 2; ch. 185, § 1; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2017 ch. 61, § 1, effective March 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 24, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to school finance audits and management studies, see §

9-1-513

.

As to career-vocational education program grants, see §

21-12-105

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (e), modifying sanctions imposed upon districts failing to provide required school data and reports.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, substituted “department” for “division” in (a), (c) and (e); in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “department shall collect” for “purpose of this section is to consolidate responsibility for collection of,” substituted “accordance with rule and regulation of the state superintendent, administer the Wyoming education resource block grant model adopted by the Wyoming legislature pursuant to W.S.

21-13-309

” for “a single entity within the department of education,” deleted “or for school facilities” at the end of the second sentence, in the third sentence, deleted “new” preceding “school,” and inserted “and subsequently modified and recalibrated as required under W.S.

21-13-309

(t)”; repealed former (b), pertaining to the division of data management and reporting; in (c), substituted “advisory committee created under subsection (d) of this section” for “division's advisory committee” in (ii)(B), substituted “21-13-309(m)(v)(D)” for “21-13-329” in (viii); in (d), deleted “to the division” following “establish an advisory committee,” substituted “state superintendent or his designee” for “administrator of the division”; and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendments. —

The first 2011 amendment, by ch. 184, § 2, added “and the statewide education accountability system established under W.S.

21-2-204

” in the introductory language of (c)(ii); in (c)(ii)(A), added “including reporting of assessment results required for determination under W.S.

21-2-204

”; and added (c)(ii)(C).

Laws 2011, ch. 184, § 8, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2011.

The second 2011 amendment, by ch. 185, § 1, effective July 1, 2011, substituted “career-vocational” for “vocational” in (c)(viii); added (c)(ix); and made related changes.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2013 amendments. —

The first 2013 amendment, by ch. 1, § 2, substituted “director” for “state superintendent” throughout the section; substituted “director” for “state superintendent of public instruction” at the beginning of (d); and deleted “On and after July 1, 2005,” at the beginning of (e).

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const.
Approved January 29, 2013.

The second 2013 amendment, by ch. 167, § 2, deleted “teachers of record and relevant” before “school principals” and added “and school district leaders” thereafter in (c)(ii)(C).

Laws 2013, ch. 167, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “state superintendent” or similar language for “director” throughout.

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (c)(ii)(C), deleted “linking student achievement with school principals and school district leaders” following “data systems.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, repealed (e)(i), which read, “All data or reports required to be submitted to the department by school districts in accordance with law or rules shall include a statement by the superintendent of the district certifying that the data submitted is complete, accurate and conform with all reporting requirements”; and in the introductory language in (e)(ii), substituted “If a district fails” for “If a district superintendent fails.”

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "career and technical" for "career-vocational" twice in (c)(viii).

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).